Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.60.901

Effective date—1985 c 329.

This act shall take effect on January 1, 1986, but the director may immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that this act is implemented on its effective date.

[ 1994 c 92 s 160; 1985 c 329 s 13. Formerly RCW 30.60.901.]